Massachusetts, session 194th, S730.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 25 of chapter 118E of the Massachusetts General Laws, as most recently
appearing, is hereby amended by inserting at the end thereof the following new section:-
(6)(A) For the purposes of this section the following words shall have the following
meanings:
“Cash Surrender Value (CSV)”, shall mean, the amount available in cash upon
cancellation of an insurance policy before it becomes payable upon death or maturity.
“Term Life Insurance”, shall mean, insurance that provides coverage for a set period and
does not accumulate any cash value. These policies are excluded from Medicaid asset
calculations.
“Permanent Life Insurance”, shall mean, whole life, universal life, and any other life
insurance policies that accumulate cash surrender value over time.
of 2

(B) The exemption for life insurance policies with cash surrender value when
determining Medicaid eligibility shall be $10,000 in face value. This exemption applies to the
combined face value of all whole life, universal life, and any other permanent life insurance
policies held by the Medicaid applicant or recipient.
(C) The face value exemption shall be adjusted for inflation every 5 years based on the
Consumer Price Index (CPI). Adjustments will be rounded to the nearest $100.
(D) Term life insurance policies shall continue to be excluded from Medicaid eligibility
calculations, as they do not accumulate any cash surrender value and are intended purely for
death benefit protection.
(E) Every three year, the office of Medicaid shall submit a report to the senate and house
committees on ways and means evaluating the financial impact of the increased exemption on
the Medicaid program, including any changes in beneficiary access to life insurance policies and
funeral costs covered by these policies.
of 2